Utah statutes.
15-8-5.   General requirements of disclosure.
(1)  A lessor shall disclose to a consumer the information required by this
chapter.  In a transaction involving more than one lessor, only one lessor
needs to make the disclosures, but all lessors shall be bound by the
disclosures.
(2)  The disclosures shall be made at or before consummation of the rental
purchase agreement.
(3)  The disclosures shall be made clearly and conspicuously in writing and a
copy of the rental purchase agreement shall be provided to the consumer at
consummation or at some specified time after consummation, with consent of the
consumer.  The disclosures required under Subsection 15-8-6(1) shall be made
on the face of the contract, above the line provided for the consumer's
signature.
(4)  If a disclosure becomes inaccurate as the result of any act, occurrence,
or agreement by the consumer after delivery of the required disclosures, the
resulting inaccuracy is not a violation of this chapter.
